Wyoming, session 2025, SF0121.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-2-234 is created to read:
31-2-234. Rodeo license plates.
(a) Any person interested in recognizing rodeo as the
official sport of this state pursuant to W.S. 8-3-119 and
supporting rodeo programs at the University of Wyoming and
Wyoming community colleges may apply for and be issued
distinctive license plates for any motor vehicle that is
not a commercial vehicle owned or leased by that person
upon registration of the vehicle. These license plates
shall be displayed upon the vehicle for which they are
issued.
(b) Application for, issuance and renewal of the
rodeo license plates under this section shall be subject to
the same vehicle registration requirements and fees as
provided in this article in addition to the fee required
under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii). Application forms shall be
available at all county treasurer's offices and shall
include space on the application form to offer the option
for the applicant to donate twenty dollars ($20.00) or more
to support rodeo programs at the University of Wyoming and
Wyoming community colleges. Any monetary donation received
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0121
ENROLLED ACT NO. 47, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
under this subsection shall be forwarded to the state
treasurer to be deposited into a separate account. As soon
as possible after July 1 of each year, the state treasurer
shall distribute monetary donations received under this
subsection from the previous year evenly between the
University of Wyoming and each Wyoming community college
for purposes of supporting the rodeo programs at the
University of Wyoming and Wyoming community colleges.
(c) The department shall prescribe the design of the
rodeo license plates authorized by this section. The rodeo
license plates shall be the same size as regular motor
vehicle license plates and need not include arabic numerals
for the county. The department shall include the following
language on the license plate: "Rodeo — The official sport
of Wyoming." The department shall arrange for production of
the license plates. Following initial approval, rodeo
license plates shall be subject to redesign on the same
schedule as all license plates beginning with the 2033
reissuance.
(d) The department may prepare any special forms and
issue any rules and regulations necessary to carry out this
section.
(e) Unless five hundred (500) sets of license plates
are issued under this section before December 31, 2031, the
plates authorized under this section shall be eliminated
from production and not later than January 15, 2032 the
department shall report the cessation of production to the
joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim
committee.
Section 2. W.S. 31-2-212 is amended to read:
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0121
ENROLLED ACT NO. 47, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
31-2-212. Loss, mutilation or destruction of
registration, plates or validation stickers.
Upon loss, mutilation or destruction of a certificate of
registration, license plate, or validation sticker the
owner of a vehicle may obtain a duplicate certificate of
registration, new license plates or validation stickers
from any county treasurer or the department if the vehicle
was registered or plates or stickers were issued by the
department upon application showing the loss, mutilation or
destruction, return of mutilated plates or stickers and
payment of the duplicate registration, plate or sticker
fee. For those vehicles registered under the provisions of
W.S. 31-2-213(h), 31-2-215 through 31-2-223, 31-2-226,
31-2-227 or 31-2-229 through 31-2-233 31-2-234 replacement
duplicate license plates may be obtained upon application
with the county treasurer from which the original plates
were purchased or the department if applicable, accompanied
by fees as provided by W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vi)(C). Duplicate
license plates obtained under this section to replace lost
or stolen plates shall not be displayed on the vehicle
until the validation stickers on the lost or stolen plates
have expired. Upon loss, mutilation or destruction of a
dealer plate or validation sticker the dealer may obtain a
replacement dealer plate or validation sticker from the
county treasurer from which he purchased the original plate
in the same manner as the owner of a vehicle and upon
payment of the appropriate fee under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vi).
Obtaining a replacement plate is not the purchase of an
additional plate under W.S. 31-16-125(b)(i). Upon
application for new license plates or stickers the county
treasurer shall notify the department and the county
sheriff as soon as possible of the loss, mutilation or
destruction. The department shall notify the appropriate
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0121
ENROLLED ACT NO. 47, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
law enforcement agencies of any loss, mutilation or
destruction of license plates or stickers.
Section 3. The department of transportation shall
make rodeo license plates available beginning on January 1,
2026.
Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4